Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB910.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4305 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4305. Dealing in infant children.(a) Offense defined.--A person is guilty of a [misdemeanor] felony of the first degree if he deals in humanity, by trading, bartering, buying, selling, or dealing in infant children.(b) Exclusion.--This section shall not apply to an otherwise legal surrogacy or adoption.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the term "infant child" means a child one year of age or younger.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617